Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General
§ 21-3-111.
Powers of boards of trustees.

The board of trustees in each school district within the state may:

Sue and be sued in the name by which the district is designated;

Acquire, hold, convey, lease, rent, and manage property, real and personal, for the benefit of the school district in the name by which the district is designated, either alone or jointly with another public or private agency, institution, person, or corporation. This includes leasing of real property under W.S.

21-15-112

;

Enter into agreements with any public or private agency, institution, person, or corporation for the performance of acts or furnishing of services or facilities by or for the school district;

Employ legal counsel and bear the cost of litigation;

Accept or reject any federal or other gift, grant, bequest, or devise;

Employ and determine the salaries and duties of:

A superintendent of schools who shall be the chief administrative officer of the district;

Principals who shall assume the administrative responsibility and instructional leadership of any schools to which they are assigned in accordance with policies adopted by the board of trustees, provided that in the event a superintendent of schools shall request recommendations from a principal concerning the suspension, dismissal, assignment, transfer or termination of any teacher employed in the school to which the principal is assigned, such recommendation shall be given only after periodic evaluation of the teacher’s classroom performance;

Teachers who shall provide the expertise in their areas of instruction;

Other certified professional employees; and

Other personnel.

Discharge any employee subject to the provisions of any applicable law governing the procedure for terminating the employment of school district employees;

Insure against loss of property;

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 502.

Become members of county, state, and national school board associations and pay dues to such associations. A board of trustees may at its discretion pay necessary travel expenses and per diem of members and personnel attending meetings of such associations at a rate not to exceed that paid state employees;

Provide for the operation of school lunch programs in schools under its jurisdiction;

Require any officer or employee whose duty it is to handle funds or property of the district, including activity accounts, to be bonded under a suitable individual or blanket bond indemnifying the district against loss. The board shall determine the amount and type of the bond;

Acquire for the school district, by condemnation, the fee simple title to any real estate situated within the district as a site for any public school buildings or school grounds or for any other necessary or beneficial school purpose, or any lesser interest, including easements and rights-of-way, when necessary in the proper maintenance and operation of the school system;

Subject to W.S. 21-6-217(b), convey, with or without consideration, title to real property which is not being used and will not be used by the district to the state or its political subdivisions for public use;

Convey or otherwise divest, with or without consideration, title to personal property which is not being used and will not be used by the district to the extent not prohibited by Article 16, Section 6, Wyoming Constitution;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 163, § 2.

Establish a school bus driver training program in accordance with W.S. 21-3-131(a);

Establish and maintain a program of adult education;

Develop policies and pest control methods including emergency policies, to minimize risk to students and employees, school property and the environment;

Enter into school building construction and renovation project agreements with the state construction department as authorized under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(v);

Request the fingerprints of any employee initially hired by a school district on or after July 1, 1996, who may have access to minors in the course of the employee’s employment, as provided by W.S. 7-19-106(a)(xxvi) and 7-19-201(a)(iii). The school district shall pay for the costs associated with the request;

Enter into or authorize the district superintendent to enter into student learner agreements as defined by W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xxxiv) with any employer pursuant to W.S.

27-14-110

;

Confer a Wyoming seal of biliteracy or an advanced distinction Wyoming seal of biliteracy upon a graduating high school student in accordance with W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xl). Not later than October 15 of each year, each school district shall report to the state superintendent the number of seals of biliteracy issued during the prior school year, the languages the students learned and the type of seal conferred.

Not later than January 1, 1998, the board of trustees of each school district that has established trustee residence areas before that date shall:

Establish by resolution that all trustees shall be elected at-large from the entire district; or

Establish by resolution a structure for electing members to the board through trustee residence areas with not less than two (2) members of the board elected at-large from the entire district. If the board establishes trustee residence areas under this paragraph, one (1) or more members shall be elected from each area. The boundaries of the trustee residence areas shall be established so that the total deviation in the population between the areas with the greatest and least population shall not, to the extent practicable, exceed ten percent (10%). Data from the last federal census shall be used in determining population within an area for the purpose of implementing this paragraph. The resolution shall include a process for implementing this change so that all elected trustees may serve their full term but that any vacancy shall be filled so as to implement the change as soon as practicable.

Not later than January 1 of any year in which a general election will be held, the board of trustees of any school district may elect to adopt a resolution under paragraph (b)(i) of this section to have all trustees elected at-large. A board of trustees for a district in which all members are elected at-large may adopt a resolution to establish trustee residence areas under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section only as of January 1 of the first year which follows a decennial federal census and in which a general election will be held.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, §§ 24, 35; R.S. 1887, §§ 3936, 3948; Laws 1888, ch. 72; Part III, § 4; 1895, ch. 50, § 1; ch. 88, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 540, 553, 593, 624, 2914; C.S. 1910, §§ 1943, 1955, 1975, 1998, 3830; C.S. 1920, §§ 2247, 2259, 2281, 2311, 4894; R.S. 1931, §§ 38-102, 99-323, 99-333, 99-352, 99-1201; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-6002, 67-616, 67-625, 67-644, 67-645; Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 14; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-744, 21-124, 21-132, 21-151, 21-152; Laws 1961, ch. 97, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 27; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-27; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1977, ch. 77, § 1; 1979, ch. 121, § 1; 1981, ch. 4, § 1; ch. 174, § 2; 1982, ch. 49, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 2; 1994, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 61, § 2; 1995, ch. 112, § 2; 1997, ch. 189, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 502; 1999, ch. 170, § 501; 2001, ch. 56, § 2; ch. 94, § 1; ch. 177, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 2; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2012, ch. 71, § 1; 2014 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 160, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 163, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b)(ii), in the second to last sentence, substituted “last federal census” for “most recent federal census”; and in (c), in the second sentence, inserted “decennial” preceding “federal census.”

The 2012 amendment,

added (a)(xxi).

Laws 2012, ch. 71 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted
“includes leasing of real property under” for “includes
capital leasing under” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(xx), substituted
“department” for “school facilities commission”
and “W.S. 21-15-123(f)(v)”
for “W.S. 21-15-114(a)(viii)”; and in (a)(xxi), substituted “and 7-19-201(a)(iii)”
for “and 7-19-210(a)(iii).”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the
act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for
a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2016, inserted “state construction”
preceding “department” in (a)(xx).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 160, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xxii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 163, § 2, effective August 1, 2021, repealed (a)(xvi), which read, “Define ‘unexcused absence’ and ‘habitual truancy’ for all students who are attending public schools and who have met compulsory attendance requirements, and establish rules and regulations regarding their attendance. For purposes of this paragraph, students participating in the annual state fair held under W.S.

11-10-101

as an exhibitor shall be considered as participating in a district cocurricular activity program and shall be defined by the board as an excused absence.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xxiii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Cross references. —

As to obtaining liability insurance, see §§

21-3-126

through

21-3-130

.

As to provisions relating to district boundary board of trustees, see §§

21-6-207

and

21-6-215

.

As to teacher contracts, see §§

21-7-101

through

21-7-114

.

As to providing insurance and other fringe benefits to teachers and other employees, see §

21-7-301

.

As to powers and duties of board under Cooperative Educational Services Act, see §§

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

.

As to condemnation procedure, see Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

Under this chapter, school boards have been granted many new and sweeping powers

which are a dramatic change from the old law, whereunder school boards only had the power to sell district property. Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

School districts intended to be more than simply agent of state. —

Powers specified in this section evidence the clear intention of making school districts more than simply an agent of the state, as is a municipal corporation. Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Board has wide discretion in management of district's affairs

and will not be interfered with by the courts unless its actions are shown to be arbitrary, capricious or fraudulent. Hyatt v. Big Horn Sch. Dist., 636 P.2d 525,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1981).

School district not entitled to eleventh amendment immunity. —

Although a school district obtains more than 1/4 of its funds from the state of Wyoming, the school district on balance is not entitled to an eleventh amendment immunity as an arm of the state of Wyoming. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Since board is more like county than arm of state. —

The characteristics of Wyoming school districts demonstrate that in Wyoming on balance a local school board is more like a county or city than it is like an arm of the state. Stoddard v. School Dist., 429 F. Supp. 890, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16623 (D. Wyo. 1977), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 590 F.2d 829, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

School board may be vicariously liable for the actions of its agents.

Courtney v. School Dist., 371 F. Supp. 401, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12070 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Section does not make each individual board member equivalent of board itself,

and a judgment against the board or the district is not a judgment against the individual board members. Correspondingly, an insurance policy covering board members individually is not transformed by operation of the statute into a policy covering a school district. St. Paul Fire & Marine Ins. Co. v. Albany County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1255,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1988).

Powers may be exercised only at meeting regularly convened. —

It is implicit in the interpretation of statutes relating to the powers and duties of school boards that such powers can be exercised only at a meeting of the board regularly convened. Twitchell v. Bowman, 440 P.2d 513,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1968).

Seeking injunction against removal of building. —

A school district which was prevented by husband of owner of land on which school building temporarily stood, under special license, from removing and using the same for some weeks, thereby sustaining irreparable loss and injury, was entitled to injunction restraining husband from interfering with building's removal. School Dist. v. Donahue, 55 Wyo. 220, 97 P.2d 663,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1940).

Incurring debt for heating plant. —

In absence of statute, a school district has authority to incur a debt reasonably necessary to install a heating plant in a new schoolhouse. School Dist. No. 3 v. Western Tube Co., 13 Wyo. 304, 80 P. 155,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1895).

Use of school buildings. —

A taxpayer is not entitled to enjoin the use of school buildings for dances, social functions, athletic contests, etc. Merryman v. School Dist., 43 Wyo. 376, 5 P.2d 267,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1931).

Determination of teacher salaries. —

Although school district administrators may not have had specific authority from school board to grant teachers pay increases which varied from established salary schedule, board could not avoid performance where it approved, honored, and renewed teachers' contracts; inconsistency with district regulations, by itself, did not render contracts invalid. Lippincott v. Board of Trustees, 3 P.3d 861,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2000).

Dismissal of teachers and employees. —

See School District No. 32, in School Dist. v. Wempen, 80 Wyo. 311, 342 P.2d 232,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1959).

The board of trustees of a school district has authority to discharge a teacher. Durst v. School Dist. No. 2, Durst v. School Dist., 39 Wyo. 442, 273 P. 675,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1929).

Power of school board to appoint a teacher carries with it implied power to remove, unless limited or restricted. Baird v. School Dist., 41 Wyo. 451, 287 P. 308,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1930).

Superintendents not teachers for tenure purposes. —

While superintendents are considered “certified professional employees” for hiring purposes, superintendents are not teachers for tenure purposes. Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Colwell, 611 P.2d 427,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 267

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Roberts v. Lincoln County School Dist. Number One, 676 P.2d 577,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1984); Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Teton Plumbing & Heating, Inc. v. Board of Trustees, 763 P.2d 843,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1988); Laramie Cnty. Sch. Dist. No. One ex rel. Bd. of Trs. v. Kinstler, 2015 WY 143,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Nov. 12, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amount of property which may be condemned for public school, 71 ALR2d 1071.

Validity of local or state denial of public school courses or activities to private or parochial school students, 43 ALR4th 776.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher, 60 ALR4th 260.

Validity, construction and effect of municipal residency requirements for teachers, principals and other school employees, 75 ALR4th 272.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with transportation of students, 23 ALR5th 1.

Validity of regulation by public school authorities as to clothes or personal appearance of pupils, 58 ALR5th 1.

§ 21-3-112.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year for each school district in the state shall begin July 1 and terminate the following year on June 30.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 3926; R.S. 1899, § 530; Laws 1907, ch. 15, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1934; C.S. 1920, § 2238; Laws 1923, ch. 19, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-316; C.S. 1945, § 67-606; Laws 1957, ch. 161, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-114; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 28; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-28.

Stated

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

, 6 P.3d 1275 (Wyo. 2000).

§ 21-3-113.
Signing of warrants and checks.

All warrants or other orders to pay money drawn on the school district treasury, and all checks on a depository, shall bear the signature of the clerk or treasurer and the chairman of the board of trustees. The signatures may be reproduced as provided in W.S.

16-2-101

through

16-2-103

.

All warrants or other orders to pay money drawn on activity or special funds shall be signed and administered in the manner provided in subsection (a) above, and in accordance with the written policy of the board of trustees. Activity or special funds shall be subject to supervision and examination by the director of the state department of audit.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, §§ 38, 39; R.S. 1887, §§ 3951, 3952; R.S. 1899, §§ 556, 557; C.S. 1910, §§ 1977, 1978; C.S. 1920, §§ 2288, 2289; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-801, 99-802; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-626, 67-627; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-133, 21-134; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 29; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-29; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Liability for using unapproved depositories. —

County treasurer and surety were liable on official bond for loss of school funds on failure of bank not designated as depository by district board of trustees. Reed v. People, 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1926).

§ 21-3-114.
Chairman of board of trustees.

The chairman of the board of trustees of each school district shall preside at all meetings of the board of trustees at which he is present.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 38; R.S. 1887, § 3951; R.S. 1899, § 556; C.S. 1910, § 1977; C.S. 1920, § 2288; R.S. 1931, § 99-801; C.S. 1945, § 67-626; W.S. 1957, § 21-133; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 30; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-30.

§ 21-3-115.
Vice-chairman and temporary chairman of board of trustees.

The vice-chairman shall preside at all meetings of the board of trustees at which the chairman is not present. If neither the chairman nor the vice-chairman is present at any meeting of the board of trustees, the members who are present shall elect a temporary chairman for the purposes of the meeting.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-31.

§ 21-3-116.
Vacancy in office of board.

If a vacancy in any office of the board of trustees shall occur for any reason the board of trustees shall elect one of their number to fill the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 93, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 3943; R.S. 1899, § 548; Laws 1901, ch. 58, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1951; C.S. 1920, § 2255; R.S. 1931, § 99-330; C.S. 1945, § 67-613; W.S. 1957, § 21-121; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 32; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-32.

§ 21-3-117.
Duties of clerk of school district.

The clerk of each school district within the state shall:

Within thirty (30) working days after the close of each fiscal year, submit all fiscal reports to the state superintendent of public instruction for the past fiscal year. The reports shall contain information required by the state superintendent. A copy of the reports shall also be filed with the county clerk of each county in which the school district is located;

Cause to be filed copies of all reports made to the state superintendent and all papers transmitted to him by school officers or other persons pertaining to the business of the district. After two (2) years have elapsed from the date of filing, microfilm copies may be treated as originals;

Cause a certificate to be endorsed upon every bond or evidence of debt, issued pursuant to law, that the same is within the lawful debt limit of such school district and is issued according to law;

Record all proceedings of the board in books to be kept for that purpose.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 41; R.S. 1887, § 3954; Laws 1890, ch. 77, § 4; 1890-91, ch. 43, § 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 559, 560; C.S. 1910, §§ 1980, 1981; C.S. 1920, §§ 2291, 2292; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-804, 99-805; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-629, 67-631; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-136, 21-138; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 33; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-33; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 2000, ch. 10, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” or a variant in (a), and made other similar changes.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(i) and (a)(2), substituted “state superintendent” and similar language for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-3-118.
Duties of treasurer of school district.

The treasurer of each school district within the state shall:

Have custody of all moneys belonging to the district and pay out the same on order of the clerk, countersigned by the chairman;

Cause an account to be kept of the receipts and expenditures of the district;

Render a statement of the finances of the district at any time when required by the district board of trustees; and cause a detailed report showing the sources of revenue and the purposes for which moneys were expended to be published at the close of each fiscal year in some newspaper of general circulation within the school district.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 46; Laws 1884, ch. 81, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3959; R.S. 1899, § 565; C.S. 1910, § 1986; C.S. 1920, § 2297; Laws 1923, ch. 37, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-810; C.S. 1945, § 67-635; W.S. 1957, § 21-142; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 34; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-34.

Cross references. —

As to bond of treasurer, see § 21-3-110(a)(ix).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Treasurer has custody of all funds

of the district. State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1898).

Liability for using unapproved depository. —

See same catchline in notes to §

21-3-113

.

§ 21-3-119.
How special meetings of board of trustees called.

The clerk of the board of trustees of each school district shall call a special meeting of the board of trustees upon the request of the chairman of the board of trustees or the request of any two (2) members of the board of trustees.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-35.

§ 21-3-120.
Notice of special or emergency meetings.

The clerk of the board of trustees of each school district shall cause notice of each special or emergency meeting of the board of trustees to be given in accordance with W.S.

16-4-404

.

The notice shall contain the purpose, time and place of the meeting, and a statement that the official minutes of such meeting will be available for inspection by any citizen at the office of the clerk of said district.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 43; R.S. 1887, § 3956; R.S. 1899, § 562; C.S. 1910, § 1983; C.S. 1920, § 2294; Laws 1923, ch. 19, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 99-807; C.S. 1945, § 67-632; W.S. 1957, § 21-139; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 36; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-36; Laws 1979, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 21-3-121.
Members of board of trustees to deliver records to successors.

At the close of their official terms, the officers of the board of trustees of each school district shall deliver to their successors all books, documents, papers, and records belonging to their offices.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-37.

§ 21-3-122.
Members of board of trustees may administer oaths.

Each member of the board of trustees of each school district may administer oaths within his respective school district in all matters pertaining to official school district business.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 4, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 541; C.S. 1910, § 1944; C.S. 1920, § 2248; R.S. 1931, § 99-324; C.S. 1945, § 67-618; W.S. 1957, § 21-126; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 38; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-38.

§ 21-3-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 83, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 39, related to open meetings of the board of trustees.

§ 21-3-124.
Failure to perform duty by officer or member of board of trustees.

Any member or officer of a board of trustees of a school district who willfully fails, refuses, or neglects to perform any duty imposed upon him by the provisions of this code [§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than thirty (30) days or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-40.

§ 21-3-125.
Application of Municipal Budget Act.

The Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act applies to every school district within the state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-41; Laws 1979, ch. 6, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

substituted “Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures” for “Municipal Budget.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Municipal Budget Act. —

The Municipal Budget Act, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1981. For present provisions relating to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, see §§

16-4-101

through

16-4-124

.

Cited

in

People v. Conner, 195 Colo. 525, 579 P.2d 1160, 1978 Colo. LEXIS 663 (Wyo. 1976).

§ 21-3-126.
Liability insurance on vehicles.

The board of trustees of any school district in the state of Wyoming or the owner of any vehicle contracted to the school district under the statutes of this state is hereby required to procure liability insurance covering any vehicle used for the transportation of school children or used in the operation of the school district. When private vehicles are contracted to the school district, the contract shall not be fully executed until the owner of the vehicle has filed with the school district the required insurance policy. The defense of governmental immunity is expressly waived in any action to the extent of any insurance coverage of the district involving such an insured vehicle.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 58, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-647; Laws 1947, ch. 103, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-154; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 42; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-42.

Stated

in

Board of Trustees v. Holso, 584 P.2d 1009,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Lutheran Hosps. & Homes Soc'y of America v. Yepsen, 469 P.2d 409,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1970); Diamond Surface, Inc. v. Cleveland, 963 P.2d 996,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Liability Insurance as Affecting Immunity from Suit,” see I Wyo. L.J. 86.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 21-3-127.
Accident insurance for pupils; fund in lieu of such insurance.

The board of trustees of any school district may arrange to make accident insurance for medical, hospital, injury, or death benefits available to any or all pupils. The cost of such insurance may be paid from the funds of the district, or by the parent or guardian of the pupil, or on a proportionate basis between the district and the parent or guardian of the pupil. In lieu of such insurance, the board of trustees of such a district either separately or in conjunction with other boards of trustees of one or more such districts of the state may establish and maintain a fund sufficient to defray the medical, hospital, or other expenses resulting from injuries suffered by such pupils. This section shall not be construed as creating or tending to create a liability of the school district so insuring its pupils; nor shall the failure to procure such accident insurance as is authorized by this section be construed as creating any liability of the school district.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 109, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-155, 21-156, 21-157; Laws 1967, ch. 42, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 43; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-43.

Cited

in

Collins v. Memorial Hosp., 521 P.2d 1339,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coverage and exceptions under student accident policy, 74 ALR2d 1253.

§ 21-3-128.
Protection or insurance of board members, teachers and other personnel against personal liability.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state may save harmless and protect all board members, teachers, and other personnel from financial loss arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence or other act resulting in accidental bodily injury or death to any person within or without the school building; provided, such board member, teacher, or other personnel at the time of the accident was acting in the discharge of his duties within the scope of his employment. Each board of trustees may procure appropriate policies of insurance to maintain this protection, or it may elect in its discretion to act as a self-insurer. This section shall not be construed as creating or tending to create a liability of the school district so protecting or insuring board members, teachers, or other personnel, nor shall the failure to procure such insurance as is authorized by this section be construed as creating any liability of the school district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 61, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-158, 21-159; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 44; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-44.

Cited

in

Collins v. Memorial Hosp., 521 P.2d 1339,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1974); Board of Trustees v. Holso, 584 P.2d 1009,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Teacher's civil liability for administering corporal punishment to pupil, 43 ALR2d 469.

Truant or attendance officer's liability for assault and battery or false imprisonment, 62 ALR2d 1328.

Civil liability of school officials for malicious prosecution, 66 ALR2d 749.

Personal liability of public school teacher in negligence action for personal injury or death of student, 34 ALR4th 228.

Personal liability of public school executive or administrative officer in negligence action for personal injury or death of student, 35 ALR4th 272.

Personal liability in negligence action of public school employee, other than teacher or executive or administrative officer, for personal injury or death of student, 35 ALR4th 328.

§ 21-3-129.
Comprehensive liability insurance; waiver of governmental immunity; property insurance.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state may procure a policy or policies of comprehensive liability insurance as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(b), self-insure as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(c)(i) or join with other school districts as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(c)(ii).

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 50, § 2.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state shall procure a policy or policies for property insurance covering all education, administrative and transportation facilities owned or maintained by the school district in an amount adequate to cover against loss or damage to those facilities, and against loss consequential upon that loss or damage, other than noncontractual legal liability for that loss or damage. The board of trustees of a school district may elect not to provide property insurance coverage for any facility valued at fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or less upon a per facility determination that the cost of insurance for the facility is disproportionately high when compared to the value of the facility to the school district. Coverage provided by a school district joint powers board pursuant to W.S. 1-39-118(c)(ii) and subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy the requirement of this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-45; 2008, ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a) substituted “as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(b), self-insure as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(c)(i) or join with other school districts as provided in W.S. 1-39-118(c)(ii)” for “which would save the school district harmless from financial loss arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment for personal injury or death occasioned by the alleged tort of any officer, employee, or agent of the school district” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second sentence pertaining to policies specifying maximum amounts for injuries; and repealed (b) and (c), pertaining to governmental immunity and school insurance on vehicles.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (d) and (e).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, at the end of (d), substituted “pursuant to W.S. 1-39-118(c)(ii) and subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy the requirement of this subsection” for “as of February 1, 2017, shall satisfy the insurance requirement of this subsection until July 1, 1018, if kept in force. The coverage may be modified as needed.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (e), which read: "The insurance department shall undertake an examination of the school district joint powers board operating a school risk retention program. The department shall report whether the school risk retention program operated by the school district joint powers board is backed by sufficient reserves, reinsurance and other factors to safely satisfy the insurance requirement provided in subsection (d) of this section. The department shall report the results of the examination and recommend any steps needed to protect the solvency of the school district joint powers board to the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee and the joint education interim committee no later than December 1, 2017."

Immunity not waived. —

Trial court
properly granted a school district and a teacher summary judgment
in a student's action to recover for injuries he sustained during
a science demonstration conducted in a school gymnasium because the
student's claims did not fall within the waiver of governmental immunity
for operation or maintenance of a building or recreation are; the
school district did not obtain insurance coverage that would extend
its liability beyond the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental Claims
Act. Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98, 353 P.3d 732,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2015).

Immunity waived only to extent of insurance. —

Pursuant to the provisions of this section, governmental immunity has been waived only to the extent of personal injury insurance carried by the school district; and plaintiff could recover for negligence, if at all, only to the extent of such insurance coverage. Fagan v. Summers, 498 P.2d 1227,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1972).

Notice of claim within limitation period required. —

While this section allows an action against a school district to the extent of its liability insurance, such an action must be brought pursuant to the procedures outlined in the Governmental Claims Act (chapter 39 of title 1). These procedures require filing of a proper notice of claim within the limitation period. Dye v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 24, 820 P.2d 982,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Holso, 584 P.2d 1009,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1978); Diamond Surface, Inc. v. Cleveland, 963 P.2d 996,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rule of municipal immunity from liability for acts in performance of governmental functions as applicable to personal injury or death as result of nuisance created or maintained by school district, 56 ALR2d 1415.

Liability of university, college, or other school for failure to protect student from crime, 1 ALR4th 1099.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher, 60 ALR4th 260.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring in physical education classes, 66 ALR5th 1.

Tort liability of schools and institutions of higher learning for personal injury suffered during school field trip, 68 ALR5th 519.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring during school athletic events, 68 ALR5th 663.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injury to student walking to or from school, 72 ALR5th 469.

When is federal agency employee independent contractor, creating exception to United States waiver of immunity under Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. § 2671), 166 ALR Fed 187.

§ 21-3-130.
From whom insurance obtained.

No school district shall obtain, sponsor, arrange, or handle insurance of any kind except from the companies which maintain an office in this state and are authorized to do business in Wyoming subject to the supervision of the state insurance commissioner.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 109, § 2; 1953, ch. 141, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-156; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 46; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-46.